test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-yedTS_gt-norm.yaml
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [еданаˮ, еднаˮ]
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [едадаˮ, еддаˮ]
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [едадоʼ, еддоʼ]
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [еданась, еднась]
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [едадась, еддась]
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [едадась, еддась]
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [еданинзь, еднинзь]
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [едадинзь, еддинзь]
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [едадинзь, еддинзь]
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [еданаць, еднаць]
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [едадаць, еддаць]
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [едадонзь, еддонзь]
     ед+N+Tra: едӈэ
     ед+N+Car: едсиˮ
     ед+N+Equ: еддаремʼ
     ед+N+Equ+Lat: еддаревʼ
